Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. Film Office.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions applicable to review of tax credits with respect to film production tax credits after the repeal of provisions of this article under §§ 3 and 4, ch. 63, SLA 2008, see § 5(a), ch. 63, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts. Note that §§ 3 — 8, ch. 63, SLA 2008 are repealed effective July 1, 2013, under §§ 34, 43 and 49, ch. 51, SLA 2012.

For transitional provision applicable to determination of qualified expenditures and award and review of tax credits under the provisions of AS

44.33.231

—

44.33.239

as they read before July 1, 2013, notwithstanding the repeal of these sections by sec. 30, ch. 51, SLA 2012, see sec. 4, ch. 21, SLA 2013.

Administrative Code. —

For child care facility loans, see 3 AAC 82.

Sec. 44.33.231.
Film production promotion program.

The film production promotion program is established in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The purpose of the film production promotion program is to

work with organizations in the private sector for the expansion and development of film production industries in the state;

promote Alaska as an appropriate location for film production;

provide production assistance through connecting film directors, makers, and producers with Alaska location scouts and contractors, including contractors providing assistance with permit applications; and

certify Alaska film production internship training programs and promote the employment of program interns by eligible productions.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 35 SLA 2015.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 63 SLA 2008; am § 29 ch 51 SLA 2012; am § 7 ch 35 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, repealed (c).

Sec. 44.33.232.
Alaska film production incentive program. [Repealed, § 30 ch 51 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 44.33.233.
Eligibility. [Repealed, § 30 ch 51 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 44.33.234.
Qualification for film production tax credit. [Repealed, § 30 ch 51 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 44.33.235.
Award of film production tax credit. [Repealed, § 30 ch 51 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 44.33.236.
Determination of qualified expenditures. [Repealed, § 30 ch 51 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 44.33.237.
Recovery of film production tax credit. [Repealed, § 30 ch 51 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 44.33.238.
Regulations. [Repealed, § 30 ch 51 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 44.33.239.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 30 ch 51 SLA 2012.]